Illinois, session 104th, SB3456.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Procurement Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to ensure 7that suppliers to the State and to political subdivisions of 8the State are safe, reliable, and free from undue influence 9from foreign adversaries. 10    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:11    "Company" means any sole proprietorship, organization, 12association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited 13partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability 14company, or other entity or business association, including 15all wholly owned subsidiaries, majority owned subsidiaries, 16parent companies, or affiliates of such entities or business 17associations, that exists for the purpose of making profit.18    "Department" means the Department of Central Management 19Services.20    "Domicile" means either the country in which a company is 21registered, the location where the company's affairs are 22primarily completed, or the location where the majority of the   SB3456- 2 -LRB104 18605 HLH 32048 b1ownership shares in the company are held. 2    "Federally banned corporation" means any company that has 3been banned at the federal level or any company that makes 4equipment that has been banned at the federal level. 5"Federally banned corporation" includes companies or equipment 6that have been banned by or under one or more of the following 7federal agencies or Acts: (i) the Federal Communications 8Commission, including, but not limited to, any equipment or 9service deemed to pose a threat to national security 10identified on the Covered List developed pursuant to 47 CFR 111.50002 and the Secure and Trusted Communications Networks Act 12of 2019; (ii) the United States Department of Commerce; (iii) 13the Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency; (iv) the 14Federal Acquisition Security Council; and (v) Section 889 of 15the John S. McCain National Defense Authorization Act for 16Fiscal Year 2019.17    "Foreign adversary" means the People's Republic of China, 18the Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, the 19Democratic People's Republic of Korea, the Republic of Cuba, 20the Venezuelan regime of Nicolás Maduro, or the Syrian Arab 21Republic, including any agent of or any other entity under 22significant control of such a foreign country of concern, or 23any other entity deemed to be a foreign adversary by the 24Governor in consultation with the Department of Central 25Management Services.26    "Foreign adversary company" means any company domiciled in   SB3456- 3 -LRB104 18605 HLH 32048 b1a foreign adversary, owned or controlled, in whole or in part, 2by the government of a foreign adversary, by individuals 3acting in official government capacities of a foreign 4adversary, by a company domiciled in a foreign adversary, or 5by any company otherwise under control of a foreign adversary. 6"Government of China" means the People's Republic of China led 7by the Chinese Communist Party. 8    Section 15. Procurement restrictions. 9    (a) Except as provided under subsection (e), the following 10covered companies shall be ineligible to bid on or submit a 11proposal for a contract with a State agency or political 12subdivision of the State for goods or services:13        (1) a foreign adversary company; or14        (2) a federally banned corporation.15    (b) For the purposes of complying with subsection (a), any 16company that offers or provides goods or services to a State 17agency or a political subdivision of the State that were 18supplied, manufactured, or produced by a covered company under 19subsection (a) shall, for the purposes of this subsection, be 20considered a covered company.21    (c) A State agency or any political subdivision of the 22State shall require a company that submits a bid or proposal 23with respect to a contract for goods or services to certify 24that the company is not a covered company as defined under 25subsection (a).  SB3456- 4 -LRB104 18605 HLH 32048 b1    (d) If the Department determines that a company has 2submitted a false certification under subsection (b) of this 3Act:4        (1) the company shall be liable for a civil penalty in 5    an amount that is equal to the greater of $250,000.00 or 6    twice the amount of the contract for which a bid or 7    proposal was submitted; and8        (2) the State agency or the Department shall terminate 9    the contract with company; and10        (3) the company shall be ineligible to bid and shall 11    not bid on any State contract for 60 months.12    (e) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a State agency may 13enter into a contract for goods manufactured by a covered 14company if:15        (1) there is no other reasonable option for procuring 16    the goods;17        (2) the contract is pre-approved by the Department; 18    and19        (3) not procuring this good would pose a greater 20    threat to the State than the threat associated with the 21    good itself. 22    Section 20. Procurement disclosure requirements; general.23    (a) Each bid or offer submitted for a contract with a State 24agency or political subdivision shall include a disclosure of 25whether or not the bidder, offeror, or any of its corporate   SB3456- 5 -LRB104 18605 HLH 32048 b1parents or subsidiaries, within the 24 months before 2submission of the bid or offer, has had business operations 3that involved contracts with or provision of supplies or 4services from or to any foreign adversary, state-owned 5enterprise of a foreign adversary, or a company domiciled 6within the jurisdiction of a foreign adversary.7    (b) A bid or offer that does not include the disclosure 8required by subsection (a) may be given a period after the bid 9or offer is submitted to cure nondisclosure. A chief 10procurement officer may consider the disclosure when 11evaluating the bid or offer or awarding the contract.12    (c) Each chief procurement officer shall provide the 13Department with the name of each entity disclosed under 14subsection (b) as doing business or having done business in or 15with a foreign adversary, a state-owned enterprise of a 16foreign adversary, or a company domiciled within a foreign 17adversary. 18    Section 25. Procurement disclosure requirements; military 19adversaries.20    (a) Any company that wishes to submit a bid or offer for a 21contract with a State agency or for any contract with a 22political subdivision of the State must certify with the State 23agency or the Department that the bidder, offeror, or any of 24its corporate parents or subsidiaries has not within the 60 25months before submission of the bid or offer, had business   SB3456- 6 -LRB104 18605 HLH 32048 b1operations that involved contracts with or provision of goods 2or services to any military entity of any foreign adversary, 3any state-owned enterprise of a foreign adversary, any 4political party of a foreign adversary, or any federally 5banned corporation.6    (b) No bid or offer may be submitted for a State contract 7or for any contract with a political subdivision of the State 8if the bidder, offeror, or any of its corporate parents or 9subsidiaries, within the 60 months before submission of the 10bid or offer, had business operations that involved contracts 11with or provision of goods or services to any military entity 12of any foreign adversary, any state-owned enterprise of a 13foreign adversary, or any federally banned corporation.14    (c) Each chief procurement officer shall provide the 15Department with the name of each entity disclosed under this 16Section as doing business or having done business in or with a 17foreign adversary, a state-owned enterprise of a foreign 18adversary, or a company domiciled within a foreign adversary.19    (d) If the Department determines that a company has 20submitted a false certification under subsection (a) of this 21Section:22        (1) the company shall be liable for a civil penalty in 23    an amount that is equal to the greater of $250,000.00 or 24    twice the amount of the contract for which a bid or 25    proposal was submitted;26        (2) the State agency or the Department shall terminate   SB3456- 7 -LRB104 18605 HLH 32048 b1    the contract with company; and2        (3) the company shall be ineligible to bid and shall 3    not bid on any State contract for 60 months. 4    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 5severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.